California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1657.)
-------------------------------------------

31035.

A district may undertake a water conservation program to reduce water use and may require as a condition of new service that reasonable water-saving devices and water reclamation devices be installed to reduce water use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31035.1.

A district which includes territory in Monterey County and which has adopted an ordinance to require water conservation and to prevent waste, may provide that violation of the ordinance is an infraction or nuisance, with penalties as provided by Section 31029.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 25.7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Property Generally [31040. - 31054.]

31040.

A district may take any property necessary to carry out the business of the district by grant, purchase, gift, devise, condemnation, or lease with or without the privilege of purchase.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

31041.

A district may hold, use, enjoy, lease, or dispose of property within or without the district necessary to the full exercise of its powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31042.

A district may construct, purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire works, water rights, land, rights, and privileges useful or necessary to convey, supply, store, or otherwise make use of water for any purposes authorized by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31045.

A district may, on terms and conditions agreed upon by the board and the board of directors of a municipal water district formed pursuant to the Municipal Water District Act of 1911:

(a) Transfer, sell, lease, or convey to the municipal water district any works, land, or structures within any improvement district formed pursuant to any of the provisions of this division.

(b) Transfer to the municipal water district the proceeds of any bonds theretofore authorized by or for the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31046.

A district may sell or lease the mineral or hydrocarbon rights in any land belonging to it when deemed by the board for the best interest of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31047.

A district may control, distribute, store, spread, sink, treat, purify, recapture and salvage any water, including sewage and storm waters, for the beneficial use or uses of the district or its inhabitants or the owners of rights to water therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 695.)
-------------------------------------------

31048.

A district may cooperate, act in conjunction and contract with the State of California or any agency thereof, municipalities, public and private corporations of any kind, and persons with respect to the salvage, control, storage, spreading, distribution, treatment, purification, and recapture of any waters, including sewage and storm waters, and the construction of any works, the acquisition of any property, or the doing of any act with respect thereto, or for the protection of property, watersheds, water courses, and underground water supplies, and for the use, operation, management, or control of any public works or property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 695.)
-------------------------------------------

31049.

A district may make and perform any agreement with the State of California or any agency thereof, any public or private corporation of any kind, and any person, or any of them for the joint construction, acquisition, disposition or operation of any property or works of a kind which might be constructed, acquired, disposed of or operated by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 695.)
-------------------------------------------

31051.

A district may acquire by any means stock of any mutual water company or corporation for the purpose of furnishing a supply of water for public, municipal or governmental purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1652.)
-------------------------------------------

31052.

The North Marin County Water District may purchase devices for generation of energy from solar radiation and may resell such devices for use within the district. Resales shall be on reasonable terms and conditions, which may include warranties and guarantees by the district of payment of purchase loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------

31053.

No publicly owned utility shall commence to provide any service for, on, or to any land within a county water district which is subject to the lien of a general obligation bonded indebtedness or which was the subject of a lease-purchase, revenue, or other type of debt incurred for capital improvements by or on behalf of the district incurred by the district for the purpose of providing a service similar to that which the utility proposes to provide.

However, a publicly owned utility may commence to provide service, otherwise prohibited, upon either of the following conditions:

(a) If the board of directors of the county water district, by resolution permits the service.

(b) In any portion of such a county water district proposed to be served by the publicly owned utility in which the total number of registered voters residing therein exceeds 200, if at least two-thirds of the voters voted at a special county water district election to permit the service. The election shall be called and held as an initiative measure pursuant to Section 30830.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 926, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

31054.

No publicly owned utility shall commence to provide any water service for, on, or to any land within a county water district which is subject to a lien of an indebtedness arising under any contract between the district and the United States of America incurred or contracted by the district for the purpose of providing water service, provided two-thirds of the voters voting at an election within the district have approved the incurrence of the indebtedness and, provided further, that the district has water available and is ready, able, and willing to serve such land.

However, a publicly owned utility may commence to provide service, otherwise prohibited, upon either of the following conditions:

(a) If the board of directors of such a county water district shall by resolution permit such service; or

(b) In any portion of such a county water district proposed to be served by the publicly owned utility in which the total number of registered voters residing therein exceeds 200, and in which at least a majority of the voters voting on the proposition shall have voted at a special county water district election to permit such service within that portion of the district. The election shall be called and held within that portion of the district as an initiative measure pursuant to Section 30830.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 18.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Construction on Rights of Way [31060. - 31062.]

31060.

A district may construct any works along, under, or across any street, water course, railway, or conduit in a manner that will afford security for life and property. The district shall restore the property crossed as near as may be to its former state or so as not to have impaired unnecessarily its usefulness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31061.

Every company whose right of way is intersected or crossed by works of the district shall unite with the district in forming the intersections and crossings and grant the rights therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31062.

The right is hereby granted to locate, construct, and maintain any of the works of a district on any land which is now or hereafter owned by the State, and a district has the same rights and privileges appertaining to the rights of way as are granted to municipalities within the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Controversies [31080. - 31088.]

31080.

A district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided in this division or by law, in all actions and proceedings in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31081.

A district may commence, maintain, intervene in, compromise, and assume the costs of any action or proceeding involving or affecting the ownership or use of waters or water rights within the district used or useful for any purpose of the district or a benefit to any land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31082.

A district may commence, maintain, intervene in, defend, and compromise actions and proceedings to prevent interference with or diminution of the natural flow of any stream or natural subterranean supply of waters which may:

(a) Be used or be useful for any purpose of the district.

(b) Be of common benefit to the land or its inhabitants.

(c) Endanger the inhabitants or land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31084.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------

31088.

The district may employ counsel to defend any action or proceeding brought against it on account of any injury, taking, damage, or destruction, or to defend as provided in Part 7 (commencing with Section 995) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code an action or proceeding brought against any of its officers, employees or servants, and the fees and expenses involved therein are a lawful charge against the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1683.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Sewer Facilities [31100. - 31106.]

31100.

A district may acquire, construct, and operate facilities for the collection, treatment and disposal of sewage, waste and storm water of the district and its inhabitants and may contract with any public agency including but not limited to sanitation districts for sewer outfall facilities. A district also may acquire, construct, and operate facilities for the collection, treatment and disposal of sewage, waste and storm water of inhabitants outside its boundaries; provided that it shall not furnish any such service to the inhabitants of any other public agency without the consent of such other public agency expressed by resolution or ordinance. The term “public agency” as used in this section, shall include a city, county, city and county, public district, municipal or public corporation, state agency or other political subdivision of the state, but shall not include a public utility subject to the jurisdiction, control and regulation of the Public Utilities Commission under the provisions of Divisions 5 (commencing with Section 10001) and 6 (commencing with Section 11501) of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 898.)
-------------------------------------------

31101.

The district may prescribe, revise and collect rates or other charges for the services and facilities furnished pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1114.)
-------------------------------------------

31101.5.

A district may supply sewage and waste services to property not subject to district taxes at special rates, terms, and conditions as are determined by the board for the services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 254, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31102.

The district may provide that such rates or other charges may be collected with the water rates of the district and that all rates shall be billed upon the same bill and collected as one item, and that in the event of failure to pay the whole or any part thereof, the district may discontinue any and all service for which such bill is rendered, but this provision shall not be construed to prohibit the collection of rates or charges by the district in any other lawful manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1114.)
-------------------------------------------

31103.

Upon providing a sewer system in any area of the district the district may declare the further maintenance or use of cesspools or other local means of sewage disposal in such area to be a public nuisance and may require all buildings used by human beings to be connected with the sewer system within such period not less than ninety days from the completion of the sewer system as may be prescribed by the district; provided, that such buildings to be connected are within one hundred feet of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1114.)
-------------------------------------------

31104.

A district may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix, levy and collect a sewage and waste service standby or availability charge. If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, the county board of supervisors may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the board shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

31104.5.

In lieu of the standby or availability charge authorized to be levied and collected pursuant to Section 31104, the Crescenta Valley County Water District may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix, levy, and collect a sewage and waste service standby or availability charge not to exceed sixty dollars ($60) per available sewer connection per year, unless the standby or availability charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, the Crescenta Valley County Water District may, by an ordinance approved by a two-thirds vote of the members of the legislative body thereof, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the district shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

31104.6.

Notwithstanding Sections 31031 and 31032.1, in the Coachella Valley Water District, the sewage and waste service standby or availability charge shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30) per acre per year for land on which the charge is levied or thirty dollars ($30) per year for a parcel less than one acre.

This section, applicable only to the Coachella Valley Water District, is necessary because of the unique and special sewage and waste water management and financing problems in the area included within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 267, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

31104.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the Tuolumne Regional Water District may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix, levy, and collect a sewage and waste service standby or availability charge of not more than thirty dollars ($30) per acre per year for each acre of land, or thirty dollars ($30) per year for each parcel of land less than an acre, to which sewer service is made available by the district, unless the standby or availability charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby or availability charge was established were followed, the Tuolumne Regional Water District may, by a four-fifths vote of the members of the board of directors, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the district shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

31104.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the Santa Ana Mountains County Water District may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix, in each fiscal year, within Community Facilities District No. 2 of the district, sewage and waste service standby or availability assessments of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per year for each acre or portion thereof to which sewage and waste service is immediately available, unless the standby or availability assessment is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The Board of Directors of the Santa Ana Mountains County Water District may establish schedules varying the assessment according to the land uses and the degree of availability or quantity of use of the sewer capacity to the affected lands.

(b) The Santa Ana Mountains County Water District may elect to have the assessments authorized by subdivision (a) for the fiscal year collected on the tax roll in the same manner, by the same persons, and at the same time, as, and together with and not separately from, county taxes. In that event, the district shall prepare a written report which shall be filed with the secretary. The report shall contain a description of each parcel of real property and the amount of the assessment for each parcel for the year.

(c) The sewage and waste service standby or availability assessment authorized by this section shall not be imposed on any subdivided parcel upon which there exists a residential unit which has been connected to domestic sewer facilities of the Santa Ana Mountains County Water District.

(d) If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby or availability assessment was established were followed, the Santa Ana Mountains County Water District may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the board shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

31105.

(a) A district may adopt ordinances relating to the provision of services and facilities pursuant to this article and the regulation of those services and facilities. Every such ordinance shall be in full force and effect immediately upon adoption, but shall be published once in full in a newspaper of general circulation, printed, published and circulated in the district within 10 days after adoption, or if there be no such newspaper it shall be posted within 10 days after adoption in three public places within the district.

(b) The publication of ordinances, as required by subdivision (a), may be satisfied by either of the following actions:

(1) The district may publish a summary of a proposed ordinance or proposed amendment to an existing ordinance. The summary shall be prepared by an official designated by the board. A summary shall be published and a certified copy of the full text of the proposed ordinance or proposed amendment shall be posted in the office of the board at least five days prior to the board meeting at which the proposed ordinance or amendment or alteration thereto is to be adopted. Within 15 days after adoption of the ordinance or amendment, the board shall publish a summary of the ordinance or amendment with the names of those directors voting for and against the ordinance or amendment and the official shall post in the office of the board a certified copy of the full text of the adopted ordinance or amendment along with the names of those directors voting for and against the ordinance or amendment.

(2) If the official designated by the board determines that it is not feasible to prepare a fair and adequate summary of the proposed or adopted ordinance or amendment, and if the board so orders, a display advertisement of at least one-quarter of a page in a newspaper of general circulation in the county shall be published at least five days prior to the board meeting at which the proposed ordinance or amendment or alteration thereto is to be adopted. Within 15 days after adoption of the ordinance or amendment, a display advertisement of at least one-quarter of a page shall be published. The advertisement shall indicate the general nature of, and provide information about, the proposed or adopted ordinance or amendment, including information sufficient to enable the public to obtain copies of the complete text of the ordinance or amendment, and the names of those directors voting for and against the ordinance or amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 553, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

31106.

From and after the posting or publication of any ordinance as provided in Section 31105 above, it shall be a misdemeanor for any person to violate any ordinance of the district adopted pursuant to Section 31105.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Sewer and Garbage Facilities in the Calaveras County Water District [31110. - 31113.]

31110.

Notwithstanding any other provisions contained in this division, the Calaveras County Water District, or an improvement district formed therein pursuant to the provisions of this division, may pursuant to the provisions of this article authorize and finance the construction, operation, and maintenance of facilities for the collection, transmission, treatment, and disposal of sewage, waste and storm water and garbage, waste and trash within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 440.)
-------------------------------------------

31111.

For the purposes of this article, the Board of Directors of the Calaveras County Water District may levy and collect taxes in the manner provided in this division. Such tax revenues shall be available for capital outlay purposes or for the accumulation of a reserve fund for capital outlay purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 440.)
-------------------------------------------

31112.

The Board of Directors of the Calaveras County Water District may levy and collect taxes in the manner provided in this division for the purpose of the maintenance and operation of any facilities constructed pursuant to Section 31110.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 440.)
-------------------------------------------

31113.

Pursuant to a resolution adopted by a fourth-fifths vote of all the members of the board, the Calaveras County Water District may deposit any funds of the district, not to exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) in amount, in a revolving fund to be available for the acquisition of real or personal property, for engineering services, or for the construction of structures or improvements needed in whole or in part to provide facilities and services within the district, or an improvement district therein, as authorized pursuant to Section 31110. Such revolving fund shall be reimbursed from service fees, connection charges, tax revenues, or other moneys available from the service area, and no sums shall be disbursed from the fund until the board has, by resolution, established the method by which, and the term, not to exceed five years, within which the fund shall be reimbursed. The fund shall be reimbursed within five years together with interest at the current legal rate per annum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 440.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Fire Protection [31120. - 31120.]

31120.

(a) A district may exercise any of the powers, functions, and duties which are vested in, or imposed upon, a fire protection district pursuant to the Fire Protection District Law of 1987, Part 3 (commencing with Section 13800) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) If the district includes any part of a local agency which provides fire protection service to any territory in the district, the district shall have no authority regarding the prevention and suppression of fires in that territory unless the district has obtained the consent of the other local agency.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1013, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Recreational Facilities [31130. - 31133.]

31130.

A district may use any water or land under its control for recreational purposes and in connection therewith may construct, maintain, and operate any works or facilities appropriate or ancillary to such recreational use; provided, that recreational use of water shall be subject to the approval of the public health authority having jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 664.)
-------------------------------------------

31131.

A district may prescribe reasonable rules and regulations to govern the use of such facilities, including regulations imposing reasonable charges for the use thereof. A district is not required to charge for the use of such facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 574.)
-------------------------------------------

31132.

The exercise of the power of eminent domain to acquire any land or interest therein for recreational purposes is limited to land within the district or land contiguous to the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 214.)
-------------------------------------------

31133.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Malaga County Water District may:

(a) Organize, promote, conduct, and advertise programs of community recreation.

(b) Establish systems of recreation and recreation centers, including parks and parkways.

(c) Acquire, construct, improve, maintain and operate recreation centers within the district.

The district shall not incur a bonded indebtedness for the purposes authorized by this section exceeding 1 percent of the assessed value of all the taxable property in the district, and no bonded indebtedness shall be incurred except for capital outlay purposes.

The district shall not exercise any powers under this section unless the exercise of those powers is approved by the voters of the district at an election held within the district at which a majority of the voters voting on the proposition approve the exercise of those powers. The election may be consolidated with any other election held within the district. If a majority of the votes cast at the election is in favor of the proposition, the county elections official shall immediately cause to be filed with the Secretary of State a certificate reciting that fact. If the voters of the district do not approve the exercise of any of those powers at an election held prior to January 1, 1974, this section shall become inoperative on that date and shall have no further force or effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 160.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Conditionally inoperative January 1, 1974, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Sanitation Service [31135. - 31142.]

31135.

A district may acquire, construct, and operate facilities for, or may contract with others for, the collection and disposal of the garbage, waste, and trash of the district and its inhabitants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

31136.

The district may prescribe, revise, and collect rates or other charges for the services furnished pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

31137.

The district may provide that such rates or charges may be collected with the water or sewer rates, or both, of the district and that all rates shall be billed upon the same bill and collected as one item, and that in the event of failure to pay the whole or any part thereof, the district may discontinue any and all services for which such bill is rendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

31138.

The district may determine that sanitary service may not be necessary or feasible for all residents or properties within the district and shall thereupon make a finding as to which type of customer or area shall be excluded from service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

31139.

The district shall determine the types of wastes to be excluded from service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

31140.

Any contract with other parties for the supplying of this service for the district shall be granted by public bid for such periods as the district determines is in the best interest of the district. In the event of failure to receive a suitable bid, the district may negotiate a contract for service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

31141.

(a) A district may adopt ordinances relating to the provision of sanitation services and the regulation of those services. Every such ordinance shall be in full force and effect immediately upon adoption, but shall be published once in full in a newspaper of general circulation, printed, published and circulated in the district within 10 days after adoption, or if there be no such newspaper it shall be posted within 10 days after adoption in three public places within the district.

(b) The publication of ordinances, as required by subdivision (a), may be satisfied by either of the following actions:

(1) The district may publish a summary of a proposed ordinance or proposed amendment to an existing ordinance. The summary shall be prepared by an official designated by the board. A summary shall be published and a certified copy of the full text of the proposed ordinance or proposed amendment shall be posted in the office of the board at least five days prior to the board meeting at which the proposed ordinance or amendment or alteration thereto is to be adopted. Within 15 days after adoption of the ordinance or amendment, the board shall publish a summary of the ordinance or amendment with the names of those directors voting for and against the ordinance or amendment and the official shall post in the office of the board a certified copy of the full text of the adopted ordinance or amendment along with the names of those directors voting for and against the ordinance or amendment.

(2) If the official designated by the board determines that it is not feasible to prepare a fair and adequate summary of the proposed or adopted ordinance or amendment, and if the board so orders, a display advertisement of at least one-quarter of a page in a newspaper of general circulation in the county shall be published at least five days prior to the board meeting at which the proposed ordinance or amendment or alteration thereto is to be adopted. Within 15 days after adoption of the ordinance or amendment, a display advertisement of at least one-quarter of a page shall be published. The advertisement shall indicate the general nature of, and provide information about, the proposed or adopted ordinance or amendment, including information sufficient to enable the public to obtain copies of the complete text of the ordinance or amendment, and the names of those directors voting for and against the ordinance or amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 553, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

31142.

After the posting or publication of any ordinance as provided in Section 31141, it is a misdemeanor for any person to violate any ordinance of the district adopted pursuant to Section 31141, and, upon conviction thereof, that person shall be punished by being imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 30 days, or by fine of not more than six hundred dollars ($600), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 215.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.3. Alameda County Water District [31142.20. -  31142.39.]

31142.20.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Alameda County Water District Groundwater Protection Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   (SB 133)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

31142.22.

This article only applies to all property within the boundaries of the Cities of Fremont, Newark, and Union City.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   (SB 133)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

31142.24.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this article.

(a) “Aquifer” means a geologic formation from which groundwater may be extracted.

(b) “Aquitard” means a geologic formation with very low permeability.

(c) “Board” means the board of directors of the district.

(d) “District” means the Alameda County Water District.

(e) “Exploratory hole” means a temporary excavation constructed by any method, for the purpose of determining subsurface
 geological or hydrogeological information.

(f) “General manager” means the general manager of the district.

(g) “Groundwater” means water beneath the natural surface of the ground, whether or not flowing through known and definite channels.

(h) “Other excavation” means an excavation or structure, other than a well or an exploratory hole, constructed by any method that intersects an aquifer, or that may impact the integrity of any aquitard located directly above an aquifer.

(i) “Well” means any artificial excavation constructed by any method for the purpose of monitoring groundwater
 levels, extracting, injecting, or circulating water, or extracting, injecting, or circulating other fluid or gas solely for the purpose of soil or groundwater remediation, beneath the natural surface of the
 ground.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   (SB 133)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

31142.26.

The district may take the following actions within the boundaries of the Cities of Fremont, Newark, and Union City to carry out this article:

(a) Adopt, by ordinance, regulations the board deems necessary or proper to carry out this article.

(b) Inspect and investigate wells, exploratory holes, and other excavations and enforce regulations adopted by the board regarding the construction, use, maintenance, repair, improvement, decommissioning, or destruction of wells, exploratory holes, other excavations, and appurtenances.

(c) Take measurements, collect data, including samples of groundwater, and make analyses pertaining to wells and
 the use of groundwater within the district.

(d) Require persons or entities to obtain a permit from the district to construct, operate, decommission, abandon, or destroy a well, exploratory hole, or other excavation.

(e) Impose and collect fees to recover the cost of inspecting wells, exploratory holes, and other excavations and otherwise implement and enforce this article.

(f) Require the sealing of abandoned or unused wells according to regulations adopted by the board that are designed to protect groundwater from contamination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   (SB 133)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

31142.28.

Any person applying for any land development permit or approval within the boundaries described in Section 31142.22 shall obtain documentation from the district indicating that existing wells or other excavations are in compliance with the regulations of the district or that no wells or other excavations have been identified within the boundaries of the property proposed to be developed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   (SB 133)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

31142.30.

Any abandoned or unused well, exploratory hole, or other excavation that creates or threatens to create a water contamination hazard is a public nuisance. The board shall adopt, by ordinance, regulations to carry out this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   (SB 133)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

31142.32.

If the district determines that a public nuisance exists, it shall, by certified mail, notify the record owner of the property to abate the public nuisance. The notice of public nuisance shall describe the public nuisance and specify the time, date, and place for a hearing regarding the public nuisance. The hearing shall take place no sooner that 10 calendar days and no later than 60 calendar days from the date of mailing of the notice of public nuisance. At the hearing, district staff shall present evidence of a public nuisance and the record owner may present evidence to the general manager that a public nuisance does not exist or has been abated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   (SB 133)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

31142.34.

If, after the hearing, the general manager determines that a public nuisance exists, the district shall, by certified mail, send a notice to the record owner requiring that the record owner abate the public nuisance within a specified time. The notice shall state that, unless the public nuisance is abated within the time specified by the district, the district may abate the public nuisance and the costs of the abatement will be assessed against the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   (SB 133)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

31142.36.
